Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3295
District; recreation area; permit hunting, fishing, trapping, weapons; violation; penalty.

(1) A district may on a temporary or permanent basis permit hunting, fishing, trapping or other forms of fur harvesting, or the public use of firearms, bow and arrow, or any other projectile weapons or devices in all or any portion of a recreation area.

(2) Any person who hunts, fishes, traps, harvests fur, or uses firearms, bow and arrow, or any other projectile weapon or device in a recreation area when not permitted by the district shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 7.